Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.140

Handling and preserving electronic recording.

Each law enforcement agency in this state shall establish and enforce procedures to ensure that the electronic recording of all or part of a custodial interrogation is identified, accessible, and preserved throughout the length of any resulting sentence, including any period of community custody extending through final discharge.

[ 2021 c 329 s 14.]